Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 4. Specific Performance; Actions for Purchase Money

Cross references. —

As to venue of action for specific performance of contract to sell realty, see §

1-5-103

.

As to specific performance and conveyance of real estate in connection with personal representatives, see §

2-7-601

et seq.

Law reviews. —

For a note, “Survivorship in the Proceeds of a Sale of Jointly Owned Property,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 63.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

71 Am. Jur. 2d Specific Performance § 1 et seq.

Provision making purchaser's obligation under land contract conditional upon securing loan, 5 ALR2d 287.

Change of conditions after execution of contract or option for sale of real property as affecting right to specific performance, 11 ALR2d 390.

Mutuality of remedy as essential to granting of specific performance, 22 ALR2d 508.

Parties to action to specific performance of contract for conveyance of realty after death of party to the contract, 40 ALR2d 938.

Indefiniteness as precluding specific performance of contract for sale or exchange of real estate failing to specify time for giving of possession, 56 ALR2d 1272.

Venue of action for specific performance of contract pertaining to real property, 63 ALR2d 456.

Economic duress or business compulsion in execution of contract for sale of real property, 12 ALR4th 1262.

Option to purchase real property as affected by optionor's receipt of offer for, or sale of, larger tract which includes the optioned parcel, 34 ALR4th 1217.

Necessity of real-estate purchaser's election between remedy of rescission and remedy of damages for fraud, 40 ALR4th 627.

Provision in land contract for liquidated damages upon default of purchaser as affecting right of vendor to maintain action for damages for breach of contract, 39 ALR5th 33.

81A C.J.S. Specific Performance § 1 et seq.

§ 1-32-401.
Completion of contract by survivors.

When two (2) or more
persons who own an interest in land become bound in writing for its
sale and conveyance and one (1) of them dies before the land is conveyed,
the survivor may by petition against the purchaser and the heirs or
devisees of the deceased party, be authorized to complete the contract.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 655; R.S. 1887, § 3003; R.S. 1899, § 4122; C.S. 1910, § 4982; C.S. 1920, § 6252; R.S. 1931, § 89-3918; C.S. 1945, § 3-7501; W.S. 1957, § 1-985; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-501.

§ 1-32-402.
Requisites of petition; copy of contract to be annexed.

The petition must set
forth the names of the contracting parties, describe the lands contracted
for, state the time the contract was made, that the contract has been
fully performed by the purchaser and have annexed a copy of the contract.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 656; R.S. 1887, § 3004; R.S. 1899, § 4123; C.S. 1910, § 4983; C.S. 1920, § 6253; R.S. 1931, § 89-3919; C.S. 1945, § 3-7502; W.S. 1957, § 1-986; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-502.

§ 1-32-403.
Findings of court; order authorizing completion of contract; requirements
and effect of deed.

If the court finds the
allegations of the petition to be true, it may order the survivors
to complete the contract by conveying the land. The deed shall recite
the order and shall convey as complete and perfect a title and have
the same effect as if executed by all the owners.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 657; R.S. 1887, § 3005; R.S. 1899, § 4124; C.S. 1910, § 4984; C.S. 1920, § 6254; R.S. 1931, § 89-3920; C.S. 1945, § 3-7503; W.S. 1957, § 1-987; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-503.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Award of damages to purchaser for delay in conveyance of land, 7 ALR2d 1204.

§ 1-32-404.
Heirs and devisees may ask completion.

The heirs at law or devisees
of a person who purchased an interest in land by written contract
and died before conveyance thereof to him, may compel conveyance as
the deceased might have done.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 660; R.S. 1887, § 3008; R.S. 1899, § 4127; C.S. 1910, § 4987; C.S. 1920, § 6257; R.S. 1931, § 89-3921; C.S. 1945, § 3-7504; W.S. 1957, § 1-988; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-504.

§ 1-32-405.
Recoupment of vendee in action for purchase money.

In actions for the recovery of purchase money for real estate by vendor against vendee, the vendee may, notwithstanding his continued possession, set up by way of counterclaim, any breach of the covenants of title acquired by him from the vendor and make any person claiming an adverse estate or interest therein party to the action. Upon the hearing the vendee may recoup against the vendor’s demand the present worth of any existing lien or encumbrance thereon.

If the adverse estate or interest is an estate in reversion or remainder or contingent upon a future event, the court may:

Order the vendee with his assent to surrender possession to his vendor upon the repayment of so much of the purchase money as has been paid, with interest; or

Direct the payment of the purchase money claimed in the action, upon the vendor giving bond in double the amount thereof with two (2) or more sureties approved by the court, conditioned for the repayment of the same with interest if the vendee or his privies are subsequently evicted by reason of the defect.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 638; R.S. 1887, § 2986; R.S. 1899, § 4105; C.S. 1910, § 4965; C.S. 1920, § 6235; R.S. 1931, § 89-3902; C.S. 1945, § 3-7002; W.S. 1957, § 1-989; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-505.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Risk of loss by casualty pending contract for conveyance of real property — modern cases, 85 ALR4th 233.